Illinois, session 104th, HB3042.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-103 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 5/1-103)  (from Ch. 68, par. 1-103)7    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-785)8    Sec. 1-103. General definitions. When used in this Act, 9unless the context requires otherwise, the term: 10    (A) Age. "Age" means the chronological age of a person who 11is at least 40 years old, except with regard to any practice 12described in Section 2-102, insofar as that practice concerns 13training or apprenticeship programs. In the case of training 14or apprenticeship programs, for the purposes of Section 2-102, 15"age" means the chronological age of a person who is 18 but not 16yet 40 years old. 17    (B) Aggrieved party. "Aggrieved party" means a person who 18is alleged or proved to have been injured by a civil rights 19violation or believes he or she will be injured by a civil 20rights violation under Article 3 that is about to occur. 21    (B-5) Arrest record. "Arrest record" means:22        (1) an arrest not leading to a conviction;23        (2) a juvenile record; or  HB3042- 2 -LRB104 02909 KTG 12922 b1        (3) criminal history record information ordered 2    expunged, sealed, or impounded under Section 5.2 of the 3    Criminal Identification Act. 4    (C) Charge. "Charge" means an allegation filed with the 5Department by an aggrieved party or initiated by the 6Department under its authority. 7    (D) Civil rights violation. "Civil rights violation" 8includes and shall be limited to only those specific acts set 9forth in Sections 2-102, 2-103, 2-105, 3-102, 3-102.1, 3-103, 103-102.10, 3-104.1, 3-105, 3-105.1, 4-102, 4-103, 5-102, 115A-102, 6-101, 6-101.5, and 6-102 of this Act. 12    (E) Commission. "Commission" means the Human Rights 13Commission created by this Act. 14    (F) Complaint. "Complaint" means the formal pleading filed 15by the Department with the Commission following an 16investigation and finding of substantial evidence of a civil 17rights violation. 18    (G) Complainant. "Complainant" means a person including 19the Department who files a charge of civil rights violation 20with the Department or the Commission. 21    (G-5) Conviction record. "Conviction record" means 22information indicating that a person has been convicted of a 23felony, misdemeanor or other criminal offense, placed on 24probation, fined, imprisoned, or paroled pursuant to any law 25enforcement or military authority.26    (H) Department. "Department" means the Department of Human   HB3042- 3 -LRB104 02909 KTG 12922 b1Rights created by this Act. 2    (I) Disability. 3    (1) "Disability" means a determinable physical or mental 4characteristic of a person, including, but not limited to, a 5determinable physical characteristic which necessitates the 6person's use of a guide, hearing or support dog, the history of 7such characteristic, or the perception of such characteristic 8by the person complained against, which may result from 9disease, injury, congenital condition of birth or functional 10disorder and which characteristic: 11        (a) For purposes of Article 2, is unrelated to the 12    person's ability to perform the duties of a particular job 13    or position and, pursuant to Section 2-104 of this Act, a 14    person's illegal use of drugs or alcohol is not a 15    disability; 16        (b) For purposes of Article 3, is unrelated to the 17    person's ability to acquire, rent, or maintain a housing 18    accommodation; 19        (c) For purposes of Article 4, is unrelated to a 20    person's ability to repay; 21        (d) For purposes of Article 5, is unrelated to a 22    person's ability to utilize and benefit from a place of 23    public accommodation; 24        (e) For purposes of Article 5, also includes any 25    mental, psychological, or developmental disability, 26    including autism spectrum disorders.   HB3042- 4 -LRB104 02909 KTG 12922 b1    (2) Discrimination based on disability includes unlawful 2discrimination against an individual because of the 3individual's association with a person with a disability. 4    (J) Marital status. "Marital status" means the legal 5status of being married, single, separated, divorced, or 6widowed. 7    (J-1) Military status. "Military status" means a person's 8status on active duty in or status as a veteran of the armed 9forces of the United States, status as a current member or 10veteran of any reserve component of the armed forces of the 11United States, including the United States Army Reserve, 12United States Marine Corps Reserve, United States Navy 13Reserve, United States Air Force Reserve, and United States 14Coast Guard Reserve, or status as a current member or veteran 15of the Illinois Army National Guard or Illinois Air National 16Guard. 17    (K) National origin. "National origin" means the place in 18which a person or one of his or her ancestors was born. 19    (K-5) "Order of protection status" means a person's status 20as being a person protected under an order of protection 21issued pursuant to the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986, 22Article 112A of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, the 23Stalking No Contact Order Act, or the Civil No Contact Order 24Act, or an order of protection issued by a court of another 25state. 26    (L) Person. "Person" includes one or more individuals,   HB3042- 5 -LRB104 02909 KTG 12922 b1partnerships, associations or organizations, labor 2organizations, labor unions, joint apprenticeship committees, 3or union labor associations, corporations, the State of 4Illinois and its instrumentalities, political subdivisions, 5units of local government, legal representatives, trustees in 6bankruptcy or receivers. 7    (L-5) Pregnancy. "Pregnancy" means pregnancy, childbirth, 8or medical or common conditions related to pregnancy or 9childbirth. 10    (M) Public contract. "Public contract" includes every 11contract to which the State, any of its political 12subdivisions, or any municipal corporation is a party. 13    (M-5) Race. "Race" includes traits associated with race, 14including, but not limited to, hair texture and protective 15hairstyles such as braids, locks, and twists. 16    (N) Religion. "Religion" includes all aspects of religious 17observance and practice, as well as belief, except that with 18respect to employers, for the purposes of Article 2, 19"religion" has the meaning ascribed to it in paragraph (F) of 20Section 2-101. 21    (O) Sex. "Sex" means the status of being male or female. 22    (O-1) Sexual orientation. "Sexual orientation" means 23actual or perceived heterosexuality, homosexuality, 24bisexuality, or gender-related identity, whether or not 25traditionally associated with the person's designated sex at 26birth. "Sexual orientation" does not include a physical or   HB3042- 6 -LRB104 02909 KTG 12922 b1sexual attraction to a minor by an adult. 2    (O-2) Reproductive Health Decisions. "Reproductive Health 3Decisions" means a person's decisions regarding the person's 4use of: contraception; fertility or sterilization care; 5assisted reproductive technologies; miscarriage management 6care; healthcare related to the continuation or termination of 7pregnancy; or prenatal, intranatal, or postnatal care. 8    (O-5) Source of income. "Source of income" means the 9lawful manner by which an individual supports himself or 10herself and his or her dependents. "Source of income" includes 11any lawful, verifiable income paid directly to a veteran, or 12to a representative of a veteran, or paid to a housing owner or 13landlord on behalf of a veteran, including federal, State, or 14local public assistance, and federal, State, or local housing 15subsidies, including, but not limited to, federal Department 16of Housing and Urban Development Veterans Affairs Supportive 17Housing vouchers. 18    (P) Unfavorable military discharge. "Unfavorable military 19discharge" includes discharges from the Armed Forces of the 20United States, their Reserve components, or any National Guard 21or Naval Militia which are classified as RE-3 or the 22equivalent thereof, but does not include those characterized 23as RE-4 or "Dishonorable". 24    (Q) Unlawful discrimination. "Unlawful discrimination" 25means discrimination against a person because of his or her 26actual or perceived: race, color, religion, national origin,   HB3042- 7 -LRB104 02909 KTG 12922 b1ancestry, age, sex, marital status, order of protection 2status, disability, military status, sexual orientation, 3pregnancy, reproductive health decisions, or unfavorable 4discharge from military service as those terms are defined in 5this Section. 6    (R) "Veteran" means an individual who has served in or is a 7current member of (i) the armed forces of the United States, 8(ii) any reserve component of the armed forces of the United 9States, or (iii) the Illinois Army National Guard or Illinois 10Air National Guard. 11(Source: P.A. 102-362, eff. 1-1-22; 102-419, eff. 1-1-22; 12102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-896, eff. 131-1-23; 102-1102, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-785, 14eff. 1-1-25.)